Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 25-10-127.
Convalescent status; discharge; readmittance.

After providing notice to the court, the county attorney who initiated involuntary hospitalization procedures, any gatekeeper designated by the department and all interested parties, the hospital may release an improved patient on convalescent leave subject to the following:

The hospital has determined that the patient is likely to follow the conditions the hospital determines necessary for the patient;

The hospital has determined that the patient will not likely be a danger to himself or others during convalescent leave; and

Release on convalescent leave shall include a plan of treatment on an outpatient or nonhospital basis and other provisions for continuing responsibility of the patient by the hospital. Prior to the end of one (1) year on convalescent leave, and not less than annually thereafter, the hospital shall reexamine the facts relating to the hospitalization of the patient on convalescent leave and if the hospital determines hospitalization is no longer anticipated, the hospital shall discharge the patient and make a report of discharge to the court, to any gatekeeper designated by the department and to the county attorney who initiated procedures for the involuntary hospitalization.

The hospital from which the patient is given convalescent leave may readmit to the hospital the involuntary hospitalized patient who has been released on convalescent leave if the hospital reasonably believes that it is in the best interests of the patient. The patient readmitted shall have all the rights he had upon admission to the hospital. Upon readmission he shall be given notice of his rights pursuant to W.S.

25-10-116

. It is the responsibility of the hospital to provide or pay for any transportation or other services in connection with any revocation of a convalescent status.

The hospital shall discharge any patient who has remained on convalescent leave for a period of two (2) continuous years.

This section shall not apply to a person who has been committed to the hospital pursuant to a criminal proceeding.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 172, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

rewrote (a) and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii); in (b), substituted “leave” for “status” following “convalescent” twice, substituted “patient” for person” in the second sentence, and made a stylistic change; and in (c), substituted “leave” for “status.”

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 25-10-128.
Access to patient information.

Any disclosure of patient information required by this article shall be subject to limitations imposed by state and federal law. The department shall promulgate rules facilitating the exchange of information required by this article to the maximum extent allowed by state and federal law. At the discretion of the court considering a matter under this article, the court may order the disclosure of information required by this article. The court also may designate and direct the actions of a gatekeeper otherwise designated by the department under W.S. 25-10-112(g) for the purpose of allowing the gatekeeper access to patient information.

History.

2016 ch. 102, § 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016 ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 25-10-129.
Receipt and disposition of revenues and gifts.

The department is authorized to deposit all monies and income received and collected by the Wyoming state hospital into a special revenue account. The department shall expend this revenue to correct life safety code problems, pay for the cost of emergency detentions pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

, pay for the costs of involuntary hospitalizations pursuant to W.S.

25-10-110

, and remediate conditions at the state hospital as identified in settlement agreements which are approved by the director and reported to the governor. If any single capital project is anticipated to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00), it shall be approved by the state building commission. The department shall report to the joint appropriations committee not later than November 1 of each year detailing expenditures under this section.

History.

2017 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.